Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2074.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 4 TLSB 5587YH (2) 91 jm/ns H.F. 2074 Section 1. Section 123.30, subsection 5, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 2 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) An entertainment district, if 3 the holder of the retail alcohol license is a participating 4 licensee within an entertainment district and in compliance 5 with the ordinance adopted under section 414.34. 6 Sec. 2. Section 123.32, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. Licensed premises for entertainment 9 districts. A local authority that is a city may define, by 10 ordinance as provided in section 414.34, licensed premises 11 which shall be used by holders of retail alcohol licenses in 12 an entertainment district. The licensed premises defined by 13 ordinance shall be used by the holders of a class âCâ or a 14 special class âCâ license. 15 Sec. 3. Section 123.46, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 16 to read as follows: 17 2. a. A person shall not use or consume alcoholic liquor, 18 wine, or beer upon the public streets or highways. A person 19 shall not use or consume alcoholic liquor in any public 20 place except premises covered by a retail alcohol license. 21 A person shall not possess or consume alcoholic liquors, 22 wine, or beer on public school property or while attending a 23 public or private school-related function. A person shall not 24 be intoxicated in a public place. A person violating this 25 subsection is guilty of a simple misdemeanor. 26 b. Notwithstanding paragraph âaâ , a person may possess 27 or consume alcoholic liquor, wine, or beer upon the public 28 streets, highways, or public places within an entertainment 29 district if the possession or consumption complies with the 30 ordinance adopted under section 414.34. 31 Sec. 4. NEW SECTION . 414.34 Entertainment districts. 32 1. As used in this section: 33 a. âEntertainment districtâ or âdistrictâ means licensed 34 premises that allow for the possession and consumption of 35 -1- LSB 5587YH (2) 91 jm/ns 1/ 4 H.F. 2074 alcoholic liquor, wine, and beer on public streets, sidewalks, 1 and other public spaces within the boundaries of the district 2 that are consistent with this section. 3 b. âLicensed premisesâ means the same as defined in section 4 123.3, except that it is limited to a place that is wholly 5 within the confines of contiguous grounds. 6 c. âMarked containerâ means a nonglass container that 7 identifies the retail alcohol licensee providing the alcoholic 8 liquor, beer, or wine in the container to the consumer within 9 the entertainment district. 10 d. âRetail alcohol licenseeâ means the holder of a class âCâ 11 or special class âCâ license issued under section 123.30. 12 2. A city may define licensed premises by ordinance that 13 designates an entertainment district for use by retail alcohol 14 licensees. 15 3. An ordinance adopted pursuant to this section must 16 include all of the following: 17 a. A legal description or map of the district. 18 b. The days and hours the possession and consumption of 19 alcoholic liquor, wine, and beer are permitted within the 20 district. 21 c. Requirements for marked container identification. 22 d. Participation requirements for retail alcohol licensees 23 within the district. 24 e. Enforcement provisions and penalties for violations. 25 f. Procedures for the revocation or suspension of all of the 26 following: 27 (1) The participation of retail alcohol licensees for 28 violations. 29 (2) The entertainment district itself for public safety 30 concerns or other matters. 31 4. An ordinance adopted by a city shall not be construed to 32 authorize any of the following: 33 a. Consumption of an alcoholic beverage in a motor vehicle 34 or on the public streets, sidewalks, and other public spaces 35 -2- LSB 5587YH (2) 91 jm/ns 2/ 4 H.F. 2074 during the times when the ordinance is not in effect. 1 b. Possession or consumption of an alcoholic beverage in 2 a manner contrary to the provisions of chapter 123 except as 3 otherwise provided by an ordinance adopted pursuant to this 4 section. 5